New Jersey, session 221, A5707.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a. For the purposes of this section: Allocated taxable net income means taxable net income as defined in subsection (w) of section 4 of P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-4). Electric public utility means a public utility, as that term is defined in R.S.48:2-13, that transmits and distributes electricity to end users within this State. Taxpayer means an electric public utility that is subject to tax as provided in the Corporation Business Tax Act (1945), P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-1 et seq.). Utility assistance program means any current or successor State program that offers financial assistance for utility services to residential customers, including, but not limited to: the Winter Termination Program established pursuant to P.L.2021, c.317 (C.40A:5A-28 et al.); any utility assistance program supported through the Universal Service Fund, established pursuant to section 12 of P.L.1999, c.23 (C.48:6-30); the Lifeline Credit Program, established pursuant to P.L.1979, c.197 (C.48:2-29.15 et seq.); the Tenants Lifeline Assistance Program, established pursuant to P.L.1981, c.210 (C.48:2-29.30 et seq.); the Low Income Home Energy Assistance Program, established pursuant to 42 U.S.C. s.8621 et seq.; the Low Income Household Water Assistance Program, established pursuant to the Consolidated Appropriations Act of 2021, Pub.L. 116-260; the Payment Assistance for Gas and Electric program, administered pursuant to R.S.46:30B-74; and any other utility assistance program administered by the State. b.    In addition to the tax paid by each taxpayer determined pursuant to section 5 of P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-5), each taxpayer that has allocated taxable net income in excess of $10,000,000 for privilege periods beginning on and after January 1 of the calendar year next following the effective date of P.L.    , c.     (pending before the Legislature as this bill) shall pay a surtax, to be known as the electric public utility windfall surtax, equal to 10 percent of the allocated taxable net income of the taxpayer.  The electric public utility windfall tax shall be due and payable in accordance with section 15 of P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-15) and shall be administered pursuant to the provisions of P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-1 et seq.).  Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law to the contrary, no credits shall be allowed against the electric public utility windfall surtax computed under this section except for credits for installment payments, estimated payments made with a request for an extension of time for filing a return, or overpayments from prior privilege periods. c.     Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the gross amount of all revenues received by the State from the electric public utility windfall surtax pursuant to this section, except for amounts credited to the special account in the General Fund created pursuant to Article VIII, Section II, paragraph 6 of the New Jersey Constitution, shall be annually appropriated to the Board of Public Utilities for the purpose of funding utility assistance programs. d.    Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the board shall not approve any rate increase or charge to ratepayers that includes the cost of compliance with this section. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to privilege periods beginning on or after January 1 of the year next following the enactment of P.L.    , c.     (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill).